Utah statutes.
48-1-2 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Interpretation of knowledge and notice.

(1) Within the meaning of this chapter, a person is deemed to have knowledge of a fact not only when he has actual knowledge thereof, but also when he has knowledge of such other facts that to act in disregard of them shows bad faith.

(2)  A person has notice of a fact within the meaning of this chapter when the person who claims the benefit of the notice:

(a)  states the fact to such person; or

(b)  delivers through the mail, or by other means of communication, a written statement of the fact to such person, or to a proper person at his place of business or residence.



No Change Since 1953 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

